en: partially hydrogenated vegetable fat, partly hydrogenated vegetable fat
bg: частично хидрогенирана растителна мазнина, частично хидрогенирани растителни мазнини
de: teilweise gehärtetes pflanzliches Fett, teilweise hydriertes pflanzliches Fett, teilweise gehärtetes Pflanzenfett
es: grasa vegetal parcialmente hidrogenada
fi: osittain kovetettu kasvirasva
fr: graisse végétale partiellement hydrogénée
hr: djelomično očvrsnuta biljna mast, djelomično hidrogenirana biljna mast
it: grasso vegetale parzialmente idrogenato
ro: grăsime vegetală parțial hidrogenată
sv: delvis härdade vegetabiliska fetter

en: non-hydrogenated vegetable fats, non-hydrogenated vegetable fat
bg: нехидрогенирани растителни мазнини, нехидрогенирана растителна мазнина
de: ungehärtete Pflanzenfette
es: grasas vegetales no hydrogenadas
fi: kovettamattomat kasvirasvat, kovettamaton kasvirasva, hydrogenoimattomat kasvirasvat, hydrogenoimaton kasvirasva
fr: matières grasses végétales non hydrogénées, matière grasse végétale non hydrogénée, graisses végétales non hydrogénées
hr: nehidrogenizirane biljne masti
it: Grassi vegetali non idrogenati
sv: ej härdade vegetabilisk fetter

en: non-hydrogenated vegetable oils, non hydrogenated vegetable oil
de: ungehärtete pflanzliche Öle
es: aceite vegetales no hidrogenados
fi: kovettamaton kasviöljy, kovettamattomat kasviöljyt, hydrogenoimaton kasviöljy hydrogenoimattomat kasviöljyt
fr: huiles végétales non hydrogénées, huile végétale non hydrogénée
hr: nehidrogenizirana biljna ulja
hu: nem hidrogénezett növényi olaj
it: oli vegetali non idrogenati

en: hydrogenated vegetable oil
da: hærdet vegetabilsk olie
de: pflanzliches Öl gehärtet
es: aceite vegetal hidrogenado
fr: huile végétale hydrogénée
hr: hidrogenirano biljno ulje
hu: hidrogénezett növényi olaj
it: Olio vegetale idrogenato
sv: härdade vegetabiliska oljor
tr: hidrojene bitkisel yağ

en: partially hydrogenated vegetable oil
da: delvist hærdet vegetabilsk olie

en: fully hydrogenated vegetable oil, fully hydrogenated vegetable oils
da: helt hærdet vegetabilsk olie
de: Ganz gehärtete pflanzliche Öle, Vollständig hydrierte pflanzliche Öle
fi: kokonaan kovetetut kasviöljyt
fr: huiles végétales totalement hydrogénées
hr: potpuno hidrogenirana biljna ulja
it: oli vegetali completamente idrogenati
nb: fullherdet vegetabilske oljer
ru: дезодорированные растительные масла
sv: fullhärdade vegetabiliska oljor

en: almond oil
bg: бадемово олио
de: Mandelöl
fr: huile d'amande
hr: bademovo ulje
it: olio di mandorle
nl: amandelolie

en: argan oil
ar: زيت أركان
az: Arqan yağı
ca: Oli d’argània
cs: Arganový olej
da: Arganolie
de: Arganöl
es: Aceite de argán
fa: روغن ارقان
fr: Huile d'argan
gl: Aceite de argán
he: שמן ארגן
hr: arganovo ulje
hu: Argánolaj
it: Olio di argan
ja: アルガン油
ko: 아르간기름
ms: Minyak argan
nl: Arganolie
no: Arganolje
pl: Olej arganowy
pt: Óleo de argão
ro: Ulei de argan
ru: Аргановое масло
sk: Arganový olej
sv: Arganolja
th: น้ำมันอาร์แกน
tr: Argan yağı
uk: Арганова олія
uz: Argan yog'i
vi: Dầu Argan

en: avocado oil, avocado vegetable oil
bg: авокадово масло, авокадово олио
da: avocadoolie
de: Avocadoöl
es: Aceite de aguacate
fi: avokadoöljy
fr: huile d'avocat
hr: ulje avokada
hu: avokádóolaj
it: olio di avocado
nb: avokadoolje
nl: avocado-olie, avocado olie
pl: olej z awokado
sv: avokadoolja

en: babassu oil, babassu
hr: babasu
it: babassu

en: camelina oil
de: Leindotteröl
fi: camelinaöljy, ruistankioöljy, kituvapellavaöljy
fr: huile de caméline
hr: kamelinovo ulje
hu: camelina olaj, sárgarepce olaj
it: cammello
pl: olej rydzowy, oleje rydzowe, oleju rydzowego

en: cashew nut oil
fr: huile de noix de cajou
hr: ulje indijskih oraha
it: olio di anacardi

en: cocoa butter, cacao butter, cocoa fat
ar: زبدة الكاكاو
bg: какаово масло
bs: kakao maslac
ca: mantega de cacau
cs: kakaové máslo
da: kakaosmør
de: Kakaobutter, Kakaofett
el: βούτυρο κακάου
eo: kakaa butero
es: manteca de cacao, manteca de cacao pura, grasa de cacao
et: kakaovõi, Kakaoõli, kakaovōi
eu: Kakao-gurin
fa: کره کاکائو
fi: kaakaovoi, kaakaovoita
fr: beurre de cacao
gl: Manteiga de cacao
he: חמאת קקאו
hr: kakao maslac, kakaov maslac
hu: Kakaóvaj
id: Budidaya kakao
is: kakósmjör
it: burro di cacao
ja: ココアバター
kk: какао майы
ko: 카카오 버터
ky: какао майы
lt: kakavos sviestas
lv: kakao sviests
mk: Какаово масло
ms: Mentega koko
nb: kakaosmør
nl: cacaoboter
pl: masło kakaowe, tłuszcz kakaowy, masła kakaowego, tłuszczu kakaowego
pt: manteiga de cacau
ro: unt de cacao, unt cacao, grăsime de cacao
ru: масло какао, какао-масло
sk: kakaové maslo
sl: Kakavovo maslo
sq: Gjalpa e kakaos, kakao gjalpë
sr: kakao maslac
sv: kakaosmör, kakaofett
tg: равгани какао
th: เนยโกโก้
tr: kakao yağı
uk: Какао-олія, какао-масло
uz: Kakao moyi, kakao yogi

en: raw cacao butter
de: Rohe Kakaobutter
fr: Beurre de cacao brut
hr: sirovi kakao maslac
it: burro di cacao crudo

en: pure cocoa butter
de: reine Kakaobutter
es: manteca de cocoa pura
fi: puhdas kaakaovoi
fr: pur beurre de cacao
hr: čisti kakao maslac
it: Burro cocco puro
nl: puur cacaoboter

en: corn oil, maize oil
ar: زيت الذرة
be: Кукурузны алей
bg: Царевично олио, царевично, царевично масло
ca: Oli de blat de moro
da: Majsolie
de: Maiskeimöl, Maisöl
el: Αραβοσιτέλαιο
eo: Maizoleo
es: Aceite de maíz
eu: Arto olio
fa: روغن ذرت
fi: Maissiöljy
fr: huile de maïs
gl: Aceite de millo
he: שמן תירס
hr: kukuruzno ulje, u različitim omjerima ulja
hu: kukoricaolaj
id: Minyak jagung
it: Olio di semi di mais, olio di mais
ja: コーン油, とうもろこし油
kk: Жүгері майы
ko: 옥수수기름
lt: Kukurūzų aliejus
nb: Maisolje
nl: Maïskiemolie, Maïsolie, maisolie
pl: Olej kukurydziany, olej z kukurydzy
pt: Óleo de milho
ro: ulei de porumb
ru: Кукурузное масло
tr: mısır yağı, mısırözü yağı
uk: Кукурудзяна олія
zh: 粟米油

en: cottonseed fat
de: Baumwollsaatfett, Baumwollfett
fr: matières grasses de coton, matières grasses végétales de coton
hr: mast sjemenki pamuka
it: grasso di semi di cotone

en: cottonseed oil, cotton seed oil, cottonseed vegetable oil, cottonseed vegetable oils
ar: زيت بذرة القطن
az: Pambıq yağı
be: Баваўняны алей
bg: памучно масло
ca: Oli de llavors de cotó
de: Baumwollsaatöl, Baumwollsamenöl
el: Βαμβακέλαιο
es: aceite de algodón
fa: روغن پنبه‌دانه
fi: puuvillansiemenöljy
fr: huile de coton, graines de coton
hr: ulje sjemenki pamuka
hu: pamutmagolaj
id: Minyak biji kapas
it: olio di semi di cotone
kn: ಹತ್ತಿಬೀಜದ ಎಣ್ಣೆ
nl: katoenzaadolie
pl: Olej z nasion bawełny, olej bawełniany
pt: Óleo de algodão
ru: Хлопковое масло
ta: பருத்தி விதை எண்ணெய்
te: పత్తిగింజల నూనె
uk: Бавовняна олія
uz: Paxta moyi
zh: 棉籽油

en: hydrogenated cottonseed oil
de: hydriertes Baumwollsamenöl
es: aceite hidrogenado de algodón
fr: Huile de graine de coton
hr: hidrogenirano ulje sjemenki pamuka
it: Olio di semi di cotone idrogenato

en: grape seed oil
bg: Олио от гроздови семки
ca: oli de llavors de raïm
cs: Hroznový olej
de: Traubenkernöl
es: Aceite de pepitas de uva, aceite de semilla de uva
eu: Mahats-pipiten olio
fa: روغن هسته انگور
fi: rypäleensiemenöljy
fr: huile de pépins de raisin
he: תרכובת
hr: ulje sjemenki grožđa
hu: szőlőmagolaj, szőlőolaj
id: grape seed oil
it: Olio di vinaccioli
ja: グレープシードオイル
ko: 포도씨유
lt: Vynuogių sėklų aliejus
nb: Druekjerneolje
nl: druivenpitolie, druivepitolie
pl: olej z pestek winogron
pt: Óleo de uva
ru: Масло виноградных косточек
zh: 葡萄籽油